New York, session 2025-2026, A2185.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 31-g of the agriculture and markets law is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. "Therapeutic agriculture" shall mean the use of agricultural activ- 4 ities, including farming, gardening, and animal husbandry, as a means of 5 promoting physical, mental and emotional well-being, rehabilitation, and 6 therapy for individuals with physical or mental health conditions, disa- 7 bilities or other special needs. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00468-01-5